Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1469.08
Businesses and organizations; late filing fee; violation; penalty.

(1) Any entity specified in subsection (1) of section 49-1469 which fails to file a report with the commission required by section 49-1469 or 49-1469.07 shall pay to the commission a late filing fee of fifty dollars for each day the statement remains not filed in violation of such sections, not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars.

(2) Any person who knowingly violates this section, section 49-1469, 49-1469.05, 49-1469.06, or 49-1469.07 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 23;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 22;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 57.
July 18, 2026